Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Noncompliance with Title.

§ 8.9A-625.
Remedies for secured party’s failure to comply with title.

Judicial orders concerning noncompliance. If it is established that a secured party is not proceeding in accordance with this title, a court may order or restrain collection, enforcement, or disposition of collateral on appropriate terms and conditions.

Damages for noncompliance. Subject to subsections (c), (d), and (f), a person is liable for damages in the amount of any loss caused by a failure to comply with this title. Loss caused by a failure to comply may include loss resulting from the debtor’s inability to obtain, or increased costs of, alternative financing.

Persons entitled to recover damages; statutory damages in consumer-goods transaction. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-628

:

a person that, at the time of the failure, was a debtor, was an obligor, or held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral may recover damages under subsection (b) for its loss; and

if the collateral is consumer goods, a person that was a debtor or a secondary obligor at the time a secured party failed to comply with this part may recover for that failure in any event an amount not less than the credit service charge plus ten percent of the principal amount of the obligation or the time-price differential plus ten percent of the cash price.

Recovery when deficiency eliminated or reduced. A debtor whose deficiency is eliminated under §

8.9A-626

may recover damages for the loss of any surplus. However, a debtor or secondary obligor whose deficiency is eliminated or reduced under §

8.9A-626

may not otherwise recover under subsection (b) for noncompliance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance.

Limitation of security interest; noncompliance with §

8.9A-210

. If a secured party fails to comply with a request regarding a list of collateral or a statement of account under §

8.9A-210

, the secured party may claim a security interest only as shown in the list or statement included in the request as against a person that is reasonably misled by the failure.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-507; 2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

This section did not enact subsection (e) of § 9-625 and subsection (f) of § 9-625 of the uniform act, referring to statutory damages.
Subsection (e) in this section is subsection (g) of § 9-625 of the uniform code.

Law Review.

For comment on cumulative remedies under article 9 of the U.C.C., see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 213 (1972).

For note, “State Action and the Constitutionality of UCC § 9-503,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 547 (1973).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1668 (1975).

For article, “Revamping Consumer-Credit Contract Law,” see 68 Va. L. Rev. 1333 (1982).

For survey on commercial law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 523 (1989).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 101.4.

§ 8.9A-626.
Action in which deficiency or surplus is in issue.

Applicable rules if amount of deficiency or surplus in issue.
In an action arising from a transaction in which the amount of a deficiency or surplus is in issue, the following rules apply:

A secured party need not prove compliance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance unless the debtor or a secondary obligor places the secured party’s compliance in issue.

If the secured party’s compliance is placed in issue, the secured party has the burden of establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was conducted in accordance with this part.

Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-628

, if a secured party fails to prove that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was conducted in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance, the liability of a debtor or a secondary obligor for a deficiency is limited to an amount by which the sum of the secured obligation, expenses, and attorney’s fees exceeds the greater of:

the proceeds of the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance; or

the amount of proceeds that would have been realized had the noncomplying secured party proceeded in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance.

For purposes of subsection (3) (B), the amount of proceeds that would have been realized is equal to the sum of the secured obligation, expenses, and attorney’s fees unless the secured party proves that the amount is less than that sum.

If a deficiency or surplus is calculated under §

8.9A-615 (f)

, the debtor or obligor has the burden of establishing that the amount of proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of prices that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

This section did not enact subsection 9-626 (b) of the uniform code referring to the limitation of the rules in subsection (a) to transactions other than consumer transactions.

§ 8.9A-627.
Determination of whether conduct was commercially reasonable.

Greater amount obtainable under other circumstances; no preclusion of commercial reasonableness. The fact that a greater amount could have been obtained by a collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance at a different time or in a different method from that selected by the secured party is not of itself sufficient to preclude the secured party from establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was made in a commercially reasonable manner.

Dispositions that are commercially reasonable. A disposition of collateral is made in a commercially reasonable manner if the disposition is made:

in the usual manner on any recognized market;

at the price current in any recognized market at the time of the disposition; or

otherwise in conformity with reasonable commercial practices among dealers in the type of property that was the subject of the disposition.

Approval by court or on behalf of creditors. A collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance is commercially reasonable if it has been approved:

in a judicial proceeding;

by a bona fide creditors’ committee;

by a representative of creditors; or

by an assignee for the benefit of creditors.

Approval under subsection (c) not necessary; absence of approval has no effect. Approval under subsection (c) need not be obtained, and lack of approval does not mean that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance is not commercially reasonable.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-507; 2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-628.
Nonliability and limitation on liability of secured party; liability of secondary obligor.

Limitation of liability of secured party for noncompliance with title. Unless a secured party knows that a person is a debtor or obligor, knows the identity of the person, and knows how to communicate with the person:

the secured party is not liable to the person, or to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against the person, for failure to comply with this title; and

the secured party’s failure to comply with this title does not affect the liability of the person for a deficiency.

Limitation of liability based on status as secured party. A secured party is not liable because of its status as secured party:

to a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows:

that the person is a debtor or obligor;

the identity of the person; and

how to communicate with the person; or

to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:

that the person is a debtor; and

the identity of the person.

Limitation of liability if reasonable belief that transaction not a consumer-goods transaction or consumer transaction. A secured party is not liable to any person, and a person’s liability for a deficiency is not affected, because of any act or omission arising out of the secured party’s reasonable belief that a transaction is not a consumer-goods transaction or a consumer transaction or that goods are not consumer goods, if the secured party’s belief is based on its reasonable reliance on:

a debtor’s representation concerning the purpose for which collateral was to be used, acquired, or held; or

an obligor’s representation concerning the purpose for which a secured obligation was incurred.

Limitation of liability for statutory damages. A secured party is not liable to any person under §

8.9A-625 (c)

(2) for its failure to comply with §

8.9A-616

.

Limitation of multiple liability for statutory damages. A secured party is not liable under §

8.9A-625 (c)

(2) more than once with respect to any one secured obligation.

History.

2000, c. 1007.